Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska68-313.01
Records and information; access by the Legislature and state and county officials; open to public; limitation.

Members of the Nebraska Legislature and all state and county officials of this state shall have free access at all times to all records and information in connection with the aid and assistance referred to in section 68-313. The public shall have free access to all information concerning lists of names and amounts of payments which appear on any financial records, except that no lists shall be used for commercial or political purposes.

Laws 1941, c. 174, § 3, p. 684;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 68-340;

R.S.1943, § 68-313;

Laws 1953, c. 234, § 1(1), p. 813;

Laws 1982, LB 522, § 30;

Laws 1983, LB 604, § 22.

Read together, section 68-313 and this section prohibit the use of welfare-related information as evidence against a welfare applicant in a criminal trial not directly connected with the administration of general assistance. State v. Owen, 1 Neb. App. 1060, 510 N.W.2d 503 (1993).